Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-618
Receipt, management, control, and disposition of property.

Notwithstanding that any property may in fact be community property, a husband or wife shall have power to receive, manage, control, and dispose of or otherwise deal with property standing in his or her name or under his or her management or control, in such manner as he or she would be so entitled to deal therewith by law, had Chapter 156, Session Laws of Nebraska, 1947, never been enacted.

Laws 1949, c. 129, § 3, p. 337.